Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 6664YH (5) 91 da/js H.F. 2734 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 202D.1 Title. 1 This chapter be shall be known and may be cited as the 2 âRetailer-Processor Fairness Actâ . 3 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 202D.2 Findings and declaration. 4 1. The general assembly finds all of the following: 5 a. Concentration in the meat industry has materially 6 impaired competition, eroding the bargaining power of Iowa 7 farmers, independent processors, and workers, while foreclosing 8 market access through captive supply arrangements, vertical 9 integration, and dominant retailer ownership of meat processing 10 facilities. 11 b. The entry of national retailers with substantial market 12 share into the direct ownership of meat processing creates 13 structural competitive disadvantages for independent Iowa 14 farmers, independent processors, and grocers that existing 15 market mechanisms have failed to remedy. 16 c. Federal law, as evidenced by the Sherman Antitrust Act of 17 1890, 15 U.S.C. Â§1 et seq., the Clayton Antitrust Act of 1914, 18 15 U.S.C. Â§12 et seq., and the Packers and Stockyards Act of 19 1921, 7 U.S.C. Â§181 et seq., reflect more than a century-long 20 federal commitment to competitive agricultural markets. 21 2. The general assembly declares the necessity to extend 22 state enforcement mechanisms to supplement provisions in 23 chapters 202, 202A, 202B, 202C, and 553 in order to further 24 deter the specific threat posed by dominant retailer ownership 25 of meat processing facilities within this state. 26 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 202D.3 Definitions. 27 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 28 requires: 29 1. a. âCovered goodâ means a grocery item, including 30 packaged food or unpackaged food. 31 b. âCovered goodâ does not include motor fuel, prescription 32 drugs, tobacco products, or alcoholic beverages. 33 2. âDepartmentâ means the department of agriculture and land 34 stewardship. 35 -1- LSB 6664YH (5) 91 da/js 1/ 8 H.F. 2734 3. âDominant retailerâ means any of the following: 1 a. A person that has annual retail sales of covered goods 2 in an aggregate amount exceeding eighteen billion dollars 3 as adjusted each year by an amount equal to the percentage 4 increase, if any, in the consumer price index for all urban 5 consumers for the last available twelve-month period published 6 in the federal register by the federal department of labor, 7 bureau of labor statistics. 8 b. A person who owns or operates at least one storefront 9 or distribution center located in more than twenty states, 10 including this state. 11 4. âProcessorâ means any establishment, plant, or operation 12 engaged in the slaughter, fabrication, processing, or packing 13 of livestock or poultry, including but not limited to the 14 production of beef, pork, lamb, chicken, or turkey products. 15 5. âProducerâ means a person who holds a legal interest in a 16 land or facility where livestock or poultry are produced. 17 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 202D.11 Prohibition on vertical 18 integration. 19 1. A dominant retailer shall not engage in vertical 20 integration by doing any of the following: 21 a. Owning or controlling a processor including through 22 direct ownership, partial ownership, an exclusive contract, or 23 the ownership or control of a livestock operation. A dominant 24 retailer, or a dominant retailerâs purchasing agent, shall not 25 directly or indirectly acquire, hold, or maintain, in whole or 26 in part, an ownership or controlling interest in a processor. 27 b. Entering into an exclusive contract with a producer that 28 requires the sale of livestock or poultry only to that dominant 29 retailer or a processor owned or controlled by the dominant 30 retailer. 31 2. A dominant retailer is liable for a violation of this 32 subchapter committed by a third party contracted by the 33 dominant retailer. 34 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 202D.12 Rulemaking. 35 -2- LSB 6664YH (5) 91 da/js 2/ 8 H.F. 2734 The attorney general, in consultation with the department, 1 shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer and 2 enforce this chapter. 3 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 202D.13 Administration and 4 enforcement. 5 1. The attorney general, in consultation with the 6 department of agriculture and land stewardship, shall determine 7 which dominant retailers are engaging in vertical integration 8 as prohibited in section 202D.11. In making this determination 9 the attorney general shall do all of the following: 10 2. a. Not later than September 1, 2027, and every two 11 years thereafter, assess each person operating as a retailer 12 of covered goods within the state and make a preliminary 13 determination of whether the person is a dominant retailer 14 acting in violation of section 202D.11. 15 b. Publish a preliminary list of the name and address of 16 each person that the attorney general has initially determined 17 to be acting in violation of section 202D.11. 18 3. Not later than October 1, 2027, and every two years 19 thereafter, if necessary, the attorney general, in consultation 20 with the department, shall conduct an inquiry regarding whether 21 a person is a dominant retailer acting in violation of section 22 202D.11. 23 a. In conducting the inquiry, the attorney general shall do 24 all of the following: 25 (1) Accept evidence, in affidavit form, signed by an 26 individual authorized to represent the person named on the 27 preliminary list stating that the named person is not a 28 dominant retailer acting in violation of section 202D.11. The 29 affidavit shall be sworn to by the affiant before an individual 30 who has authority to administer the oath. 31 (2) Accept petitions or public comment submitted by 32 interested persons, that includes evidence that a person is 33 a dominant retailer acting or not acting in violation of 34 section 202D.11. The evidence shall be admitted using the same 35 -3- LSB 6664YH (5) 91 da/js 3/ 8 H.F. 2734 standard as provided in section 17A.4. 1 b. Within thirty days of accepting all evidence described in 2 paragraph âaâ , the attorney general, in consultation with the 3 department, shall make a final decision as to whether a person 4 is a dominant retailer acting in violation of section 202D.11. 5 The attorney generalâs final decision constitutes final agency 6 action under chapter 17A, and the person may seek judicial 7 review of such agency action pursuant to section 17A.19. 8 4. Notwithstanding subsection 3, a person included on 9 the preliminary list as provided in subsection 2 may demand 10 a contested case proceeding as provided in chapter 17A to 11 determine the question of whether the person is a dominant 12 retailer acting in violation of section 202D.11. The attorney 13 generalâs final decision constitutes final agency action under 14 chapter 17A and the person may seek judicial review of such 15 agency action pursuant to section 17A.19. 16 5. The attorney general shall publish a final list of the 17 name and address of each person that the attorney general has 18 determined to be a dominant retailer acting in violation of 19 section 202D.11. A person shall not be included on the final 20 list until after the time that the personâs right to seek 21 judicial review has expired or after all judicial review of the 22 personâs rights has been exhausted, and the attorney generalâs 23 final decision has been upheld. The final list shall be posted 24 on the attorney generalâs internet site. 25 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 202D.14 Compliance. 26 1. Not later than thirty days after the attorney general 27 publishes a final list that includes the name of a person who 28 the attorney general has determined to be a dominant retailer 29 acting in violation of section 202D.11, the person must submit 30 a compliance plan to the attorney general for approval by the 31 attorney general acting in cooperation with the department. 32 The compliance plan shall specify how the dominant retailer 33 will do all of the following: 34 a. Divest itself of any interest in a processor owned or 35 -4- LSB 6664YH (5) 91 da/js 4/ 8 H.F. 2734 controlled by the dominant retailer. 1 b. Relinquish any interest in a contract entered into with 2 a producer. 3 2. a. A person whom the attorney general has determined to 4 be a dominant retailer acting in violation of section 202D.11 5 included on the final list described in subsection 1 of this 6 section must comply with section 202D.11 within one year from 7 the date the final list is published. 8 b. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , the attorney general 9 may, upon request of the person described in paragraph âaâ , 10 extend the date of compliance by one hundred eighty days if the 11 attorney general determines that the person is acting in good 12 faith to complete the compliance plan. The attorney general 13 may base the decision to extend the period for compliance on 14 criteria established by the attorney general. 15 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 202D.15 Injunctive relief. 16 The attorney general or a county attorney may apply to the 17 district court for injunctive relief in order to restrain a 18 person from acting in violation of this chapter. 19 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 202D.16 Civil penalty. 20 A person who violates a provision of this chapter or rules 21 adopted or orders issued under this chapter is subject to 22 a civil penalty of fifty thousand dollars. Each day of a 23 violation constitutes a separate offense. Moneys imposed, 24 assessed, and collected by the attorney general will be 25 credited to the general fund of the state. 26 Sec. 10. NEW SECTION . 202D.17 Criminal offenses. 27 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, a person who 28 knowingly violates a provision of this chapter or rules adopted 29 or orders issued under this chapter commits a class âDâ felony. 30 2. A person who falsely swears to a fact by an affidavit 31 required in section 202D.13 commits perjury under section 32 720.2. 33 Sec. 11. NEW SECTION . 202D.21 Health and safety program. 34 1. a. The department shall establish and administer a 35 -5- LSB 6664YH (5) 91 da/js 5/ 8 H.F. 2734 program for processors who comply with fair labor practices 1 with financial incentives to support health and safety 2 practices for their employees. 3 b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âfair labor practicesâ includes 4 a processorâs commitment to bargain with unions or associations 5 representing the processorâs employees. 6 2. The department shall implement this program when the 7 general assembly appropriates moneys required to support its 8 administration of a health and safety program to be implemented 9 by participating processors. 10 Sec. 12. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall 11 divide chapter 202D, as enacted in this Act, into subchapters 12 and shall designate sections 202D.1 through 202D.10 as 13 subchapter I, sections 202D.11 through 202D.20 as subchapter 14 II, and section 202D.21 as subchapter III. 15